Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-409
Transfer of patients.

An attending physician or other health care provider who is unwilling to comply with the Rights of the Terminally Ill Act shall take all reasonable steps as promptly as practicable to transfer care of the declarant to another physician or health care provider who is willing to do so.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 9.